Washington statutes.
RCW 4.40.060

Trial of certain issues of fact—Jury.

An issue of fact, in an action for the recovery of money only, or of specific real or personal property shall be tried by a jury, unless a jury is waived, as provided by law, or a reference ordered, as provided by statute relating to referees.

[ 1893 c 127 s 33; Code 1881 s 204; 1877 p 42 s 208; 1873 p 52 s 206; 1869 p 50 s 208; 1854 p 164 s 183; RRS s 314.]